Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.110

License renewal—Fee—Reinstatement.

Licenses issued in conformance with this chapter shall be renewed periodically on a date to be set by the director in conformance with RCW 43.24.140. A license holder who fails to pay the prescribed fee within ninety days following the date of expiration shall pay a renewal fee equal to the current fee plus an amount equal to one year's renewal fee. Any license that has been expired for five years or more may be reinstated in conformance with rules adopted by the director. Reinstatement conditions may include demonstration of continued practice or competency in the practice of geology or an approved specialty of geology.

[ 2000 c 253 s 12.]